tests/morphophonology/ь.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  tat.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

  "[twol] -Cь words with front harmony":
    роль<n><abl> : рольдән
    руль<n><abl> : рульдән
    автомобиль<n><abl> : автомобильдән
    ансамбль<n><abl> : ансамбльдән

  "[twol] -Cь words with back harmony":
    акрополь<n><abl> : акропольдан

  "[twol] -CьC words with back harmony":
    асфальт<n><acc> : асфальтны
    фонарь<n><acc> : фонарьны
    кольт<n><px3sp><nom> : кольты
    вольт<n><px3sp><nom> : вольты

  "[twol] -CьV words with back harmony":
    статья<n><acc> : статьяны
    ателье<n><px3sp><nom> : ательесы
    декольте<n><px3sp><nom> : декольтесы

  "[twol] {I} surfaces as е after deleted ь but back harmony follows":
    фасоль<n><px3sp><dat> : фасолена

  "[twol] other forced back harmony":
    ателье<n><acc> : ательены
    декольте<n><px3sp><nom> : декольтесы

  "[twol] months no ь deletion":
    январь<n><loc> : январьда
    февраль<n><loc> : февральдә
    апрель<n><loc> : апрельдә
    июнь<n><loc> : июньдә
    июль<n><loc> : июльдә
    сентябрь<n><loc> : сентябрьдә
    октябрь<n><loc> : октябрьдә
    ноябрь<n><loc> : ноябрьдә
    декабрь<n><loc> : декабрьдә

  "[twol] months ь deletion":
    январь<n><px3sp><loc> : январенда
    февраль<n><px3sp><loc> : февралендә
    апрель<n><px3sp><loc> : апрелендә
    июнь<n><px3sp><loc> : июнендә
    июль<n><px3sp><loc> : июлендә
    сентябрь<n><px3sp><loc> : сентябрендә
    октябрь<n><px3sp><loc> : октябрендә
    ноябрь<n><px3sp><loc> : ноябрендә
    декабрь<n><px3sp><loc> : декабрендә

  "[twol] basic ь deletion":
    яшь<n><px1sg><nom> : яшем
    яшь<n><px3sp><nom> : яше

  "[twol] ь in loanwords":
    власть<n><px3sg><nom> : власте
    власть<n><px3sg><dat> : властена
    ансамбль<n><px3sg><nom> : ансамбле
    ансамбль<n><px3sg><dat> : ансамбленә
    
  "[twol] no ь deletion":
    табигать<n><abl> : табигатьтән
    вәзгыять<n><abl> : вәзгыятьтән
